Utah statutes.
19-3-106.4.   Generator site access permits.
(1)  A generator or broker may not transfer radioactive waste to a commercial
radioactive waste treatment or disposal facility in the state without first
obtaining a generator site access permit from the executive secretary.
(2)  The board may make rules pursuant to Section 19-3-104 governing a
generator site access permit program.
(3) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (3)(b), the department shall
establish fees for generator site access permits in accordance with Section
63J-1-504.
(b)  On and after July 1, 2001 through June 30, 2002, the fees are:
(i)  $1,300 for generators transferring 1,000 or more cubic feet of
radioactive waste per year;
(ii)  $500 for generators transferring less than 1,000 cubic feet of
radioactive waste per year; and
(iii)  $5,000 for brokers.
(c)  The department shall deposit fees received under this section into the
Environmental Quality Restricted Account created in Section 19-1-108.
(4)  This section does not apply to a generator or broker transferring
radioactive waste to a uranium mill licensed under 10 C.F.R. Part 40, Domestic
Licensing of Source Material.
